Utah statutes.
31A-35-402.   Authority related to bail bonds.

(1)  A bail bond surety company may only issue bail bonds.

(2) In accordance with Section 31A-23a-205, a bail bond producer may not execute or issue a bail bond in this state without holding a current appointment from a bail bond surety or current designation from a bail bond company.

(3)  A bail bond surety may not allow any person who is not a bail bond producer to engage in the bail bond surety business on the bail bond surety's behalf, except for individuals:

(a)  employed solely for the performance of clerical, stenographic, investigative, or other administrative duties that do not require a license as:

(i)  a bail bond surety company; or

(ii)  a bail bond producer; and

(b)  whose compensation is not related to or contingent upon the number of bonds written.

